Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.761

Recovery residences—Technical assistance for residences seeking certification. (Expires July 1, 2025.)

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the authority shall contract with the nationally recognized recovery residence organization based in Washington that is approved by the authority in RCW 41.05.760 to provide technical assistance to recovery residences actively seeking certification. The technical assistance shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) New manager training;

(b) Assistance preparing facility operations documents and policies; and

(c) Support for working with residents on medication-assisted treatment.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2025.

[ 2019 c 264 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 264: See note following RCW 41.05.760.